Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201153-186
Consumption of liquor on public property;
forbidden; exceptions; license authorized.

(1) Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section or
section 60-6,211.08, it shall be unlawful for any person to consume
alcoholic liquor upon property owned or controlled by the state or any governmental
subdivision thereof unless authorized by the governing bodies having jurisdiction
over such property.

(2) The commission may issue licenses for the sale of alcoholic liquor
at retail (a) on lands owned by public power districts, public power and irrigation
districts, the Bureau of Reclamation, or the Corps of Army Engineers or (b)
for locations within or on structures on land owned by the state, cities,
or villages or on lands controlled by airport authorities. The issuance of
a license under this subsection shall be subject to the consent of the local
governing body having jurisdiction over the site for which the license is
requested as provided in the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 44, p. 402;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-344;

R.S.1943, § 53-186;

Laws 1953, c. 182, § 5, p. 576;

Laws 1967, c. 332, § 12, p. 891;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 45;

Laws 1999, LB 585, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB281, § 1.
August 27, 2011